Missouri, session 2026, SB1380.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 105, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 105.471, to read as
follows:
105.471. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Control", the power, direct or indirect, whether
or not exercised, to determine, direct, dictate, or decide
important matters affecting an entity, including but without
limitation, through:
(a) The ownership of at least twenty percent of the
total outstanding voting interest in an entity;
(b) Board representation;
(c) The ability to appoint or discharge any board
members, officers, directors, employees, or contractors;
(d) Proxy voting, a special share, contractual
arrangements, legal obligations, formal or informal
arrangements to act in concert; or
(e) Any other means;
(2) "Foreign adversary", any of the following:

SB 1380 2
(a) The People's Republic of China, the Russian
Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic
People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, the
Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro, or the Syrian Arab
Republic;
(b) Any agency or instrumentality of the governments
listed in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(c) Any person owned or operated in whole or in part
by the governments listed in paragraph (a) of this
subdivision, or subject to the control of such government,
and any subsidiary or parent of any such person; and
(d) Any person organized under the laws of a
government listed in paragraph (a) of this subdivision or
having its principal place of business in that country, and
any subsidiary of any such person;
(3) "Foreign adversary client", any of the following:
(a) A current or former:
a. Official in the executive, legislative,
administrative, military, or judicial branches of a foreign
adversary, whether elected or not;
b. Official of a foreign political party of a foreign
adversary; or
c. Executive or officer of a foreign adversary;
(b) A corporation, business, or other entity that has
been formed by, or for the benefit of, any person described
in paragraph (a) of this subdivision; and
(c) An immediate family member of any person described
in paragraph (a) of this subdivision, including such
person's spouse, parents, siblings, children, and spouse's
parents and siblings;
(4) "Foreign political party", any organization or any
other combination of individuals in a country other than the

SB 1380 3
United States, or any unit or branch thereof, having for an
aim or purpose, or which is engaged in any activity devoted
in whole or in part to, the establishment, administration,
control, or acquisition of administration or control, of a
government of a foreign country or a subdivision thereof, or
the furtherance or influencing of the political or public
interests, policies, or relations of a government of a
foreign country or a subdivision thereof;
(5) "Lobbyist", the same meaning as in section 105.470;
(6) "Owned or operated in whole or in part":
(a) In the case of a publicly traded company, that a
foreign adversary has the ability to control the company,
has access to any material nonpublic technical information
in the possession of the company, or has any other rights or
involvement in directing, dictating, controlling, or
participating in the decision-making of the company beyond
those available to a retail investor holding an equivalent
share of ownership; and
(b) In the case of a privately held company, that a
foreign adversary has any share of ownership of such company.
(7) "People's Republic of China", the People's
Republic of China and all provinces and autonomous regions
of the People's Republic of China, including the Hong Kong
Special Administrative Region of the People's Republic of
China, and the Macao Special Administrative Region of the
People's Republic of China; but does not include Taiwan;
(8) "Person", any individual, partnership,
association, joint stock company, trust, corporation,
organization or other combination of individuals, or
government entity;
2. A lobbyist shall not receive, or agree to receive,
any direct or indirect compensation or other payment in any

SB 1380 4
form, including intangible or in-kind, for carrying out any
lobbying activity on behalf of another person that is any of
the following:
(1) A foreign adversary;
(2) A foreign political party of a foreign adversary;
or
(3) A foreign adversary client.
3. A lobbyist who violates this section shall be
subject to an action for disgorgement of any compensation
received as well as a civil penalty of not more than one
thousand dollars per violation. An action may be filed by
the attorney general in the name of the state to obtain
disgorgement, civil penalties, as well as injunctive relief
requiring compliance with this section.
4. If the attorney general has reason to believe that
any person is violating this section, or has agreed to
conduct that would violate this section, the attorney
general may subpoena documents, tangible things, and other
information, as well as written responses under oath to
100 questions or oral testimony under oath, to any person that
101 may have knowledge or information regarding such potential
102 violation. The attorney general may also file a civil action
103 to enforce or otherwise obtain the assistance of a court
104 with respect to any such subpoena.
105 5. The provisions of sections 105.955 to 105.981 shall
106 not apply to this section.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
✓